Utah statutes.
13-39-203.   Rulemaking authority.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division shall make rules to establish procedures under which:

(1) (a)  a person may register a contact point with the division under Section 13-39-201, including:

(i)  the information necessary to register an instant message identity; and

(ii)  for purposes of Subsection 13-39-102(1)(b)(iv), an electronic address that is similar to a contact point listed in Subsection 13-39-102(1); and

(b)  a school or other institution that primarily serves minors may register its domain name with the division under Section 13-39-201;

(2)  the division shall:

(a)  provide a mechanism under which a person described in Subsection 13-39-201(4) may verify compliance with the registry to remove registered contact points from the person's communications; and

(b)  establish the mechanism described in Subsection (2)(a) in a manner that protects the privacy and security of a contact point registered with the division under Section 13-39-201; and

(3)  the division may:

(a)  implement a program offering discounted fees to a sender who meets enhanced security conditions established and verified by the division, the third party registry provider, or a designee; and

(b)  allow the third party registry provider to assist in any public or industry awareness campaign promoting the registry.

